Utah statutes.
34A-3-104.   Employer liability for compensation.

(1)  Every employer is liable for the payment of disability and medical benefits to every employee who acquires a disability, or death benefits to the dependents of any employee who dies, by reason of an occupational disease under the terms of this chapter.

(2)  Compensation may not be paid when the last day of injurious exposure of the employee to the hazards of the occupational disease occurred before 1941.

